District of Columbia statutes.
42-817

Sale of property — Amount creditor to pay if purchaser.

If a creditor, for the payment of whose debt property shall be sold under a deed of trust, shall become the purchaser at such sale, he shall be entitled to credit the amount of the purchase money against the debt, and shall be only required to pay to the trustee the excess of the purchase money over his debt, together with such additional amount as may be necessary to defray the expenses of the sale.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1274, ch. 854, § 544
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263,§ 1601, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(b), 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (90 day) revival of section, see § 403(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).
Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).
D.C. Law 14-132 revived this section as of November 6, 2001. This section had been previously repealed by D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601.
1973 Ed., § 45-617.
1981 Ed., § 45-717.